Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 20 TLSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS ââ FY 2026-2027 2 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS. There is 3 appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 4 department of veterans affairs for the fiscal year beginning 5 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, 6 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 7 designated: 8 1. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS ADMINISTRATION 9 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 10 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 11 equivalent positions: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,369,205 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 15.00 14 2. IOWA VETERANS HOME 15 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 16 purposes: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,145,736 18 a. The Iowa veterans home billings involving the department 19 of health and human services shall be submitted to the 20 department on at least a monthly basis. 21 b. The Iowa veterans home expenditure report shall be 22 submitted monthly to the general assembly. 23 3. HOME OWNERSHIP ASSISTANCE PROGRAM 24 For transfer to the Iowa finance authority for the 25 continuation of the home ownership assistance program for 26 persons who are or were eligible members of the armed forces 27 of the United States or eligible service members pursuant to 28 section 16.54: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,200,000 30 DIVISION II 31 AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES ââ FY 2026-2027 32 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ AGING 33 AND DISABILITY SERVICES. There is appropriated from the 34 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 35 -1- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 1/ 42 H.F. _____ services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 1 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 2 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 3 For aging programs for the department of health and human 4 services and area agencies on aging to provide citizens of 5 Iowa who are 60 years of age and older with case management; 6 for Iowaâs aging and disabilities resource centers; for the 7 return to community program; for the purposes of chapter 231E; 8 to administer the prevention of elder abuse, neglect, and 9 exploitation program pursuant to section 231.56A, in accordance 10 with the requirements of the federal Older Americans Act of 11 1965, 42 U.S.C. Â§3001 et seq., as amended; for the operation 12 of the dependent adult abuse services program pursuant to 13 chapter 235B; for matching funding for programs to enable 14 persons with severe physical or mental disabilities to function 15 more independently; for costs associated with centers for 16 independent living; and for other services which may include 17 but are not limited to adult day care, respite care, chore, 18 information and assistance, and material aid; for information 19 and options counseling for persons with disabilities; and 20 for salaries, support, administration, maintenance, and 21 miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following 22 full-time equivalent positions: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 19,379,531 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 88.00 25 1. Moneys appropriated in this section may be used to 26 supplement federal moneys received under federal regulations. 27 To receive moneys appropriated in this section, a local area 28 agency on aging shall match the moneys with moneys from other 29 sources according to rules adopted by the department. Moneys 30 appropriated in this section may be used for services not 31 specifically enumerated in this section only if approved by the 32 department as part of an area agency on agingâs area plan. 33 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $949,282 34 is allocated to be used for the comprehensive family support 35 -2- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 2/ 42 H.F. _____ program created in section 231.80 as enacted under this Act. 1 3. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $33,632 2 is allocated to be used to build community capacity through 3 the coordination and provision of training opportunities in 4 accordance with the consent decree of Conner v. Branstad, No. 5 4-86-CV-30871 (S.D. Iowa, July 15, 1994). 6 DIVISION III 7 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ââ FY 2026-2027 8 Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 9 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH. There is appropriated from the general fund 10 of the state to the department of health and human services for 11 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 12 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 13 to be used for the purposes designated: 14 For behavioral health prevention, education, early 15 intervention, treatment, recovery support, and crisis 16 services in order to support statewide access to treatment for 17 behavioral health conditions; stabilization and mitigation of 18 behavioral health crises; and recovery for individuals and 19 families impacted by behavioral health conditions. Activities 20 shall align with accepted best practice guidance standards for 21 behavioral health including those published by the centers for 22 disease control and prevention of the United States department 23 of health and human services, and the substance abuse and 24 mental health services administration of the United States 25 department of health and human services, for health promotion; 26 universal, selective, and indicated prevention; treatment; and 27 recovery services and supports; and shall include a 24-hour 28 helpline, public information resources, professional training, 29 youth prevention, program evaluation, and efforts at the state 30 and local levels, and for not more than the following full-time 31 equivalent positions: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,127,121 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 71.00 34 1. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $300,000 35 -3- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 3/ 42 H.F. _____ is allocated to support the work of the childrenâs behavioral 1 health system including evidence-based behavioral health 2 prevention, treatment, and recovery services and supports for 3 children and their families. 4 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $950,000 5 is allocated for an integrated substance use disorder managed 6 care system. The department shall maintain the level of mental 7 health and substance use disorder treatment services provided 8 by the managed care contractors, and shall take the steps 9 necessary to continue the federal waivers as needed to maintain 10 the level of services. 11 Sec. 4. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ SPORTS 12 WAGERING RECEIPTS FUND. There is appropriated from the 13 sports wagering receipts fund created in section 8.57I, to the 14 department of health and human services for the fiscal year 15 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 16 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for 17 behavioral health prevention, education, early intervention, 18 treatment, recovery support, and crisis services in order to 19 support statewide access to treatment for behavioral health 20 conditions; stabilization and mitigation of behavioral health 21 crises; and recovery for individuals and families impacted by 22 behavioral health conditions: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,750,000 24 DIVISION IV 25 PUBLIC HEALTH ââ FY 2026-2027 26 Sec. 5. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ PUBLIC 27 HEALTH. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 28 state to the department of health and human services for the 29 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 30 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 31 used for the purposes designated: 32 For programs that support health promotion, protect the 33 health and safety of the public, conduct disease surveillance 34 and investigation to reduce the incidence of morbidity and 35 -4- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 4/ 42 H.F. _____ mortality, serve individuals with chronic conditions including 1 but not limited to cancer, support the Iowa donor registry as 2 specified in section 142C.18, and strengthen the health care 3 delivery system and workforce to improve health outcomes for 4 all Iowans, and for not more than the following full-time 5 equivalent positions: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 22,024,369 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 348.60 8 1. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $95,000 is 9 allocated for a child vision screening program implemented 10 through the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics in 11 collaboration with early childhood Iowa areas. The program 12 shall submit a report to the department regarding the use 13 of funds allocated under this subsection. The report shall 14 include the objectives and results for the program year 15 including the target population and how the funds allocated 16 assisted the program in meeting the objectives; the number, 17 age, and location within the state of individuals served; 18 the type of services provided to the individuals served; the 19 distribution of moneys based on the services provided; and the 20 continuing needs of the program. 21 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $96,000 shall 22 be used for a grant to a nationally affiliated volunteer eye 23 organization that has an established program for children and 24 adults and that is solely dedicated to preserving sight and 25 preventing blindness through education, nationally certified 26 vision screening and training, and community and patient 27 service programs. The contractor shall submit a report to the 28 general assembly regarding the use of funds allocated under 29 this subsection. The report shall include the objectives and 30 results for the program year including the target population 31 and how the funds allocated assisted the program in meeting the 32 objectives; the number, age, grade level if appropriate, and 33 location within the state of individuals served; the type of 34 services provided to the individuals served; the distribution 35 -5- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 5/ 42 H.F. _____ of moneys based on the services provided; and the continuing 1 needs of the program. 2 3. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, the following 3 amounts are allocated to the department of health and human 4 services to be used as follows to support the goals of 5 increased access, health system integration, and engagement: 6 a. $600,000 for distribution to a nonprofit organization 7 that established the first statewide drug donation repository 8 for continuation of the pharmaceutical infrastructure for 9 safety net providers established as described in 2007 Iowa 10 Acts, chapter 218, section 108, and for the prescription drug 11 donation repository program established in chapter 135M. 12 Moneys under this paragraph shall be distributed in their 13 entirety on July 1, 2026, for the purpose specified. 14 b. $374,000 for distribution to free clinics, as defined in 15 section 135.24, and a nonprofit organization that facilitates 16 the initiation, operation, and collaboration of free clinics 17 for necessary infrastructure, statewide coordination, provider 18 recruitment, service delivery, and provision of assistance to 19 patients in securing a medical home inclusive of oral health 20 care. Of the moneys allocated, $40,000 shall be used to lower 21 fees associated with using an electronic prescribing system. 22 Moneys under this paragraph shall be distributed in their 23 entirety on July 1, 2026, for the purpose specified. 24 c. $25,000 for distribution to an organization that raises 25 awareness about issues related to rural health clinics for 26 necessary infrastructure and service delivery transformation. 27 Moneys under this paragraph shall be distributed in their 28 entirety on July 1, 2026, for the purpose specified. 29 4. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $600,000 30 is allocated for rural psychiatric residencies for residents 31 selected on or before June 30, 2026. 32 5. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $20,000 is 33 allocated to make radon test kits available, free of charge, 34 to homeowners and renters in the state. The department shall 35 -6- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 6/ 42 H.F. _____ provide a link on the departmentâs internet site for homeowners 1 and renters in the state to order radon test kits. 2 6. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $2,300,000 is 3 allocated for awarding grants for medical residency programs in 4 the state that meet the following criteria: 5 a. The medical residency program is not sponsored by the 6 university of Iowa hospitals and clinics. 7 b. The medical residency program is not related to the 8 practice of family medicine. 9 7. The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics under 10 the control of the state board of regents shall not receive 11 indirect costs from the moneys appropriated in this section. 12 The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics billings to the 13 department shall be, at a minimum, on a quarterly basis. 14 DIVISION V 15 COMMUNITY ACCESS AND ELIGIBILITY ââ CHILD SUPPORT SERVICES ââ 16 TANF ââ FY 2026-2027 17 Sec. 6. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ COMMUNITY 18 ACCESS AND ELIGIBILITY. There is appropriated from the 19 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 20 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 21 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 22 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 23 To be used for salaries, support, maintenance, and 24 miscellaneous purposes and for family investment program (FIP) 25 assistance in accordance with chapter 239B, and for other costs 26 associated with providing needs-based benefits or assistance 27 including but not limited to maternal and child health, oral 28 health, obesity prevention, the promoting independence and 29 self-sufficiency through employment, job opportunities and the 30 basic skills (PROMISE JOBS) program, supplemental nutrition 31 assistance program (SNAP) employment and training, the FIP 32 diversion program, family planning, rent reimbursement, 33 and eligibility determinations for medical assistance, food 34 assistance, and the childrenâs health insurance program, and 35 -7- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 7/ 42 H.F. _____ for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 74,610,079 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 870.40 3 1. Of the child support collections assigned under FIP, 4 the federal share of the child support collections shall be 5 credited to the child support services appropriation made in 6 this division of this Act. Of the remainder of the child 7 support collections assigned under FIP, a portion shall be 8 credited to community access and eligibility, and the remaining 9 moneys may be used to increase recoveries, to sustain cash flow 10 in the collection services center refund account as provided in 11 section 252B.13A, or for technology needs. If child support 12 collections assigned under FIP are greater than estimated or 13 are otherwise determined not to be required for maintenance of 14 efforts, the state share of either amount is appropriated to 15 the department for child support services as described in this 16 division of this Act, or may be transferred to or retained in 17 the collection services center refund account. 18 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $3,075,000 is 19 allocated for continuation of the departmentâs initiative to 20 provide for adequate developmental surveillance and screening 21 during a childâs first five years. The moneys shall first be 22 used to fully fund the current participating counties to ensure 23 that those counties are fully operational, with the remaining 24 moneys to be used for expanding participation to additional 25 counties. Full implementation and expansion shall include 26 enhancing the scope of the initiative through collaboration 27 with child health specialty clinics to promote the use of 28 developmental surveillance and screening to support healthy 29 child development through early identification and response to 30 biomedical and social determinants of healthy development by 31 providing practitioner consultation and continuous improvement 32 through training and education, particularly for children 33 with behavioral conditions and needs. The department shall 34 also collaborate with the Medicaid program and child health 35 -8- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 8/ 42 H.F. _____ specialty clinics to assist in coordinating the activities 1 of the first five initiative into the establishment of 2 patient-centered medical homes developed to improve health 3 quality and population health while reducing health care costs. 4 To the maximum extent possible, moneys allocated in this 5 subsection shall be utilized as matching moneys for Medicaid 6 program reimbursement. 7 3. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $1,145,102 is 8 allocated to the Iowa commission on volunteer service created 9 in section 15H.2 for programs and grants. 10 4. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $127,500 11 is allocated to the Iowa food bank association, as defined 12 in section 190B.201, to operate a supplemental nutrition 13 assistance program hotline. 14 5. The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics under 15 the control of the state board of regents shall not receive 16 indirect costs from the moneys appropriated in this section. 17 The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics billings to the 18 department shall be, at a minimum, on a quarterly basis. 19 Sec. 7. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ CHILD 20 SUPPORT SERVICES. There is appropriated from the general fund 21 of the state to the department of health and human services for 22 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 23 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 24 to be used for the purposes designated: 25 For child support services, including salaries, support, 26 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than 27 the following full-time equivalent positions: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,644,114 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 464.00 30 1. Federal access and visitation grant moneys shall be used 31 for services designed to increase compliance with the child 32 access provisions of court orders, including but not limited to 33 neutral visitation sites and mediation services. 34 2. Moneys appropriated in this section may be used 35 -9- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 9/ 42 H.F. _____ throughout the fiscal year in the manner necessary for 1 cash flow management. For cash flow management under this 2 subsection, the department may temporarily draw more than the 3 amount appropriated provided the amount appropriated is not 4 exceeded at the close of the fiscal year. 5 Sec. 8. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 6 TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES BLOCK GRANT. There is 7 appropriated from the special fund created in section 8.41 to 8 the department of health and human services for the fiscal year 9 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, from moneys 10 received under the federal temporary assistance for needy 11 families (TANF) block grant pursuant to the federal Personal 12 Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, 13 Pub. L. No. 104-193, and successor legislation, including TANF 14 block grant moneys received in any prior fiscal year that 15 were deposited in the special fund and remain unencumbered 16 or unobligated on June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or 17 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 18 designated: 19 1. For community access and eligibility: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,566,312 21 2. For community access and eligibility to provide 22 pregnancy prevention grants on the condition that family 23 planning services are funded: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,913,203 25 Pregnancy prevention grants shall be awarded to programs 26 in existence on or before July 1, 2026, if the programs have 27 demonstrated positive outcomes. Grants shall be awarded 28 to pregnancy prevention programs developed after July 1, 29 2026, if the programs are based on existing models that have 30 demonstrated positive outcomes. Grants must comply with the 31 requirements provided in 1997 Iowa Acts, chapter 208, section 32 14, subsections 1 and 2, including the requirement that a 33 program awarded a grant must emphasize sexual abstinence. 34 Priority in awarding grants shall be given to programs 35 -10- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 10/ 42 H.F. _____ that serve areas of the state which demonstrate the highest 1 percentage of unplanned pregnancies of females of childbearing 2 age within the geographic area to be served by the grant. 3 3. To meet one of the four purposes of TANF as specified 4 in 45 C.F.R. Â§260.20, including by modernizing the program 5 to promote economic mobility and self-sufficiency, ensuring 6 that families are able to overcome benefit cliffs, encouraging 7 healthy families, and streamlining service delivery to reduce 8 duplication: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25,000,000 10 4. For early intervention and supports for child abuse 11 prevention and the family development and self-sufficiency 12 (FaDSS) grant program in accordance with section 216A.107: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,013,980 14 5. For accountability, compliance, program integrity, 15 technology needs, and other resources necessary to meet 16 federal and state reporting, tracking, and case management 17 requirements, and other departmental needs: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,533,647 19 6. For state child care assistance: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 42,281,826 21 7. For child protective services: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 67,249,100 23 a. Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection, 24 $1,658,000 shall be allocated for child protection centers 25 located in Iowa pursuant to the child protection center grant 26 program under section 135.118. The grant amounts under the 27 program shall be equalized so that each center receives a 28 uniform base amount of $245,000, and the remaining moneys 29 are awarded through a funding formula based upon the volume 30 of children served by a center. To increase access to child 31 protection center services for children in rural areas, the 32 funding formula for awarding the remaining moneys shall provide 33 for awarding an enhanced amount to eligible grantees to develop 34 and maintain satellite centers in underserved regions of the 35 -11- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 11/ 42 H.F. _____ state. 1 b. Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection, up to 2 $227,000 shall be used for the public purpose of continuing a 3 grant to a nonprofit human services organization that provides 4 services to individuals and families in multiple locations in 5 southwest Iowa and Nebraska, for support of a project providing 6 immediate, sensitive support and forensic interviews, medical 7 exams, needs assessments, and referrals for victims of child 8 abuse and their nonoffending family members. 9 DIVISION VI 10 MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ââ STATE SUPPLEMENTARY ASSISTANCE ââ 11 HEALTHY AND WELL KIDS IN IOWA PROGRAM AND OTHER HEALTH-RELATED 12 PROGRAMS ââ FY 2026-2027 13 Sec. 9. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ MEDICAL 14 ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, STATE SUPPLEMENTARY ASSISTANCE, AND HEALTHY 15 AND WELL KIDS IN IOWA PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the 16 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 17 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 18 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 19 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 20 For medical assistance program reimbursement and associated 21 costs as specifically provided in the reimbursement 22 methodologies in effect on June 30, 2026, except as otherwise 23 expressly authorized by law, consistent with options under 24 federal law and regulations, and contingent upon receipt of 25 approval from the office of the governor of reimbursement for 26 each abortion performed under the medical assistance program; 27 for the state supplementary assistance program; for the health 28 insurance premium payment program; and for maintenance of 29 the healthy and well kids in Iowa (Hawki) program pursuant 30 to chapter 514I, including supplemental dental services, 31 for receipt of federal financial participation under Tit. 32 XXI of the federal Social Security Act, which creates the 33 childrenâs health insurance program; and for other specified 34 health-related programs: 35 -12- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 12/ 42 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,995,889,295 1 1. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, 2 $1,930,142,662 is allocated for medical assistance program 3 reimbursement and associated costs. Of the moneys allocated 4 in this subsection, $3,383,880 shall be used for program 5 administration, outreach, and enrollment activities of the 6 state family planning services program pursuant to section 7 217.41B , and of this amount, the department may use $200,000 8 for administrative expenses. 9 2. Iowans support reducing the number of abortions 10 performed in our state. Moneys appropriated under this section 11 shall not be used for abortions, unless otherwise authorized 12 under this section. 13 3. The provisions of this section relating to abortions 14 shall also apply to the Iowa health and wellness plan created 15 pursuant to chapter 249N . 16 4. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $4,479,762 is 17 allocated for the state supplementary assistance program. 18 5. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $61,266,871 19 is allocated for maintenance of the Hawki program pursuant 20 to chapter 514I , including supplemental dental services, for 21 receipt of federal financial participation under Tit. XXI of 22 the federal Social Security Act, which creates the childrenâs 23 health insurance program. 24 Sec. 10. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ HEALTH 25 PROGRAM OPERATIONS. There is appropriated from the general 26 fund of the state to the department of health and human 27 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 28 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 29 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 30 For health program operations and the autism support program 31 under section 225D.2, and for not more than the following 32 full-time equivalent positions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 41,129,136 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 82.00 35 -13- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 13/ 42 H.F. _____ 1. The department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 1 shall provide all state matching moneys for survey and 2 certification activities performed by the department of 3 inspections, appeals, and licensing. The department of health 4 and human services shall be solely responsible for distributing 5 the federal matching moneys for such activities. 6 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, a sufficient 7 amount is allocated for the administration of the health 8 insurance premium payment program, including salaries, support, 9 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes. 10 3. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $750,000 is 11 allocated for a nonprofit organization that provides access 12 to emergency poison information and treatment. Pursuant to 13 the directive under 2014 Iowa Acts, chapter 1140, section 14 102, the federal matching moneys available to the nonprofit 15 organization from the department under the federal Childrenâs 16 Health Insurance Program Reauthorization Act of 2009 shall be 17 subject to the federal administrative cap rule of 10 percent 18 applicable to moneys provided under Tit. XXI of the federal 19 Social Security Act, and shall be included in the departmentâs 20 calculations of the cap. 21 4. Unless otherwise provided by law, if a contract for 22 services provided under this section initially entered into 23 during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 24 June 30, 2027, provides for an annual increase of the cost of 25 services provided under the contract, the annual increase shall 26 not exceed the amount by which the consumer price index for 27 all urban consumers increased during the immediately preceding 28 calendar year. This subsection does not affect a contract 29 entered into on or before June 30, 2026, that is for a term of 30 more than one year. 31 Sec. 11. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 32 PHARMACEUTICAL SETTLEMENT ACCOUNT. There is appropriated 33 from the pharmaceutical settlement account created in section 34 249A.33 to the department of health and human services for the 35 -14- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 14/ 42 H.F. _____ fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 1 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 2 used for the purposes designated: 3 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to 4 supplement the appropriation made in this Act from the general 5 fund of the state for health program operations under the 6 medical assistance program for the same fiscal year: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 234,193 8 Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ QUALITY 9 ASSURANCE TRUST FUND. Notwithstanding any provision of law 10 to the contrary, and subject to the availability of moneys, 11 there is appropriated from the quality assurance trust fund 12 created in section 249L.4 to the department of health and human 13 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 14 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 15 necessary, for the purposes designated: 16 To supplement the appropriation made in this Act from the 17 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 18 services for medical assistance for the same fiscal year: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,216,205 20 Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ HOSPITAL 21 HEALTH CARE ACCESS TRUST FUND. Notwithstanding any provision 22 of law to the contrary, and any subject to the availability of 23 moneys, there is appropriated from the hospital health care 24 access trust fund created in section 249M.4 to the department 25 of health and human services for the fiscal year beginning July 26 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so 27 much thereof as is necessary, for the purposes designated: 28 To supplement the appropriation made in this Act from the 29 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 30 services for medical assistance for the same fiscal year: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 33,920,554 32 Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 33 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH FUND. Notwithstanding section 225A.7, 34 subsection 2, and subject to the availability of moneys, there 35 -15- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 15/ 42 H.F. _____ is appropriated from the behavioral health fund established in 1 section 225A.7, to the department of health and human services 2 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 3 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 4 for the purposes designated: 5 To supplement the appropriation made in this Act from the 6 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 7 services for medical assistance for the fiscal year beginning 8 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,771,589 10 Sec. 15. REIMBURSEMENT RATES. 11 1. Reimbursement for medical assistance, state 12 supplementary assistance, and social service providers and 13 services reimbursed under the purview of the department of 14 health and human services shall remain at the reimbursement 15 rate in effect on June 30, 2026, or shall be determined 16 pursuant to the reimbursement methodology in effect on June 30, 17 2026, with the exception of the following: 18 a. If reimbursement is otherwise negotiated by contract or 19 pursuant to an updated fee schedule. 20 b. As otherwise provided in this section. 21 2. a. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 22 contrary, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 23 ending June 30, 2027, the department of health and human 24 services shall reimburse case-mix nursing facility rates based 25 on the methodology in effect on June 30, 2026. 26 (2) July 1, 2025, through December 31, 2025, the department 27 of health and human services shall calculate each nursing 28 facilityâs case-mix index for rates effective July 1, 2026. 29 (3) January 1, 2026, through June 30, 2026, the department 30 of health and human services shall calculate each nursing 31 facilityâs case-mix index for rates effective January 1, 2027. 32 (4) (a) Medicaid managed care organizations shall adjust 33 the following rates based upon payment rate listings issued by 34 the department of health and human services: 35 -16- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 16/ 42 H.F. _____ (i) Nursing facility-specific rates. 1 (ii) Medicaid low utilization payment adjustment (LUPA) 2 rate-based services. 3 (iii) Medicaid home health agency services. 4 (iv) Private duty nursing and personal care services 5 provided under the Medicaid early and periodic screening, 6 diagnosis, and treatment program. 7 (v) Medicaid home and community-based waiver services. 8 (b) A rate adjustment made pursuant to subparagraph 9 division (a) shall be applied retroactively to the effective 10 date of the applicable rate letter issued by the department of 11 health and human services. 12 b. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, $1,167,867 13 shall be used to increase to the extent possible reimbursement 14 rates for ambulatory surgical centers compared to rates in 15 effect on June 30, 2026. 16 c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, $2,800,000 17 shall be used to increase to the extent possible reimbursement 18 rates for providers of rehabilitation and speech therapy 19 services compared to rates for such services in effect on June 20 30, 2026. 21 d. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, $250,000 22 shall be used to increase to the extent possible reimbursement 23 rates for air medical services provided by an entity that 24 has over forty years of experience and is the largest 25 community-based provider of air medical services compared to 26 rates for such services in effect on June 30, 2026. 27 e. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, $300,000 28 shall be used to increase to the extent possible reimbursement 29 rates for providers of adult day services, as defined in 30 section 231D.1, compared to rates for such services in effect 31 on June 30, 2026. 32 f. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, $5,000,000 33 shall be used to increase to the extent possible reimbursement 34 rates for providers of Medicaid home and community-based 35 -17- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 17/ 42 H.F. _____ elderly waiver services compared to rates for such services in 1 effect on June 30, 2026. 2 g. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, $250,000 3 shall be used to increase to the extent possible reimbursement 4 rates for prosthetics compared to rates for such prosthetics in 5 effect on June 30, 2026. 6 h. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, $333,000 7 shall be used to increase to the extent possible reimbursement 8 rates for special population nursing facilities compared to 9 rates for such special population nursing facilities in effect 10 on June 30, 2026. 11 DIVISION VII 12 FAMILY WELL-BEING AND PROTECTION ââ FY 2026-2027 13 Sec. 16. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ STATE 14 CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE. There is appropriated from the general 15 fund of the state to the department of health and human 16 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 17 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 18 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 19 For state child care assistance in accordance with sections 20 237A.13 and 237A.14, and for not more than the following 21 full-time equivalent positions: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 31,983,000 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 53.00 24 1. If the appropriation made for purposes of the state child 25 care assistance program for the fiscal year is determined to 26 be insufficient, it is the intent of the general assembly to 27 appropriate sufficient moneys for the fiscal year to avoid 28 application of waiting list requirements. 29 2. A portion of the state match for the federal child care 30 and development block grant shall be provided as necessary to 31 meet federal matching moneys requirements through the state 32 general fund appropriation made for child development grants 33 and other programs for at-risk children in section 279.51. 34 Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ EARLY 35 -18- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 18/ 42 H.F. _____ INTERVENTION AND SUPPORTS. There is appropriated from the 1 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 2 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 3 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 4 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 5 For promotion of optimum health status for children and 6 adolescents from birth through 21 years of age, and for 7 families, and for not more than the following full-time 8 equivalent positions: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 35,346,904 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 29.00 11 1. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, not more than 12 $734,000 is allocated for the healthy opportunities for parents 13 to experience success (HOPES) â healthy families Iowa (HFI) 14 program established pursuant to section 135.106. 15 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $4,313,854 16 is allocated for the FaDSS grant program, and not more 17 than 5 percent of the allocated moneys shall be used for 18 administration of the grant program. 19 3. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $29,256,799 20 shall be deposited in the early childhood Iowa fund created in 21 section 256I.11. 22 Sec. 18. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ CHILD 23 PROTECTIVE SERVICES. There is appropriated from the general 24 fund of the state to the department of health and human 25 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 26 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 27 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 28 For child, family, and adoption services, and for salaries, 29 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not 30 more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $164,052,467 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 977.00 33 1. Based on client need, a portion of the moneys 34 appropriated in this section may be used to provide other 35 -19- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 19/ 42 H.F. _____ resources required to support family preservation, emergency 1 client need, or family reunification efforts. 2 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, a sufficient 3 amount is allocated for foster family care, group foster care 4 maintenance and services, shelter care, child welfare emergency 5 services, qualified residential treatment programs, supervised 6 apartment living contracts, and for medical assistance program 7 reimbursement and associated costs. 8 3. Federal moneys received by the state during the fiscal 9 year beginning July 1, 2026, as the result of the expenditure 10 of state moneys appropriated during a previous state fiscal 11 year for a service or activity funded under this section, 12 are appropriated to the department to be used as additional 13 moneys for services and purposes provided under this section. 14 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under this 15 subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close 16 of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 17 for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding 18 fiscal year. 19 4. a. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $748,000 20 is allocated for the payment of the expenses of court-ordered 21 services provided to children who are under the supervision 22 of the department, which expenses are a charge upon the state 23 pursuant to section 232.141, subsection 4. 24 b. Notwithstanding chapter 232 or any other provision of 25 law to the contrary, a district or juvenile court shall not 26 order any service which is a charge upon the state pursuant to 27 section 232.141, subsection 4, if the moneys allocated under 28 paragraph âaâ for court-ordered services are insufficient to 29 pay for the service. 30 5. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $4,359,500 31 is allocated for the preparation for adult living program 32 established pursuant to section 234.46. 33 6. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, a portion may 34 be used for family-centered services for purposes of complying 35 -20- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 20/ 42 H.F. _____ with the federal Family First Prevention Services Act of 2018, 1 Pub. L. No. 115-123, and successor legislation. 2 7. a. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, 3 $39,823,955 is allocated for adoption subsidy payments and 4 related costs. 5 b. Any moneys remaining after the allocation under 6 paragraph âaâ is designated and allocated as state savings 7 resulting from implementation of the federal Fostering 8 Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008, 9 Pub. L. No. 110-351, and successor legislation, as determined 10 in accordance with 42 U.S.C. Â§673(a)(8), and shall be used for 11 post-adoption services and for other purposes allowed under 12 those federal Acts and regulations, and Tit. IV-B or Tit. IV-E 13 of the federal Social Security Act. 14 8. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, a sufficient 15 amount is allocated to support training needs for child welfare 16 providers and to address disproportionality within the child 17 welfare system. 18 9. If a separate funding source is available that reduces 19 the need for state moneys within an allocation under this 20 section, the allocated state moneys may be redistributed to 21 other allocations under this section for the same fiscal year. 22 DIVISION VIII 23 STATE-OPERATED SPECIALTY CARE ââ FY 2026-2027 24 Sec. 19. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 25 STATE-OPERATED SPECIALTY CARE. There is appropriated from the 26 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 27 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 28 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 29 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 30 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 31 purposes at institutions under the jurisdiction of the 32 department of health and human services, and for not more than 33 the following full-time equivalent positions: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,225,768 35 -21- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 21/ 42 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 756.00 1 1. The department shall utilize the moneys appropriated in 2 this section as necessary to maximize bed capacity and to most 3 effectively meet the needs of the individuals served. 4 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, the following 5 amounts are allocated to each institution as follows: 6 a. For the state mental health institute at Cherokee: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 19,878,962 8 b. For the state mental health institute at Independence: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,760,205 10 c. For the civil commitment unit for sexual offenders at 11 Cherokee: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,272,111 13 d. For the state resource center at Woodward: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,567,092 15 e. For the state training school at Eldora: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 19,805,171 17 f. For outstanding obligations related to workersâ 18 compensation, the sick leave insurance program, unemployment, 19 and other costs related to the closure of the state resource 20 center at Glenwood: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 942,227 22 DIVISION IX 23 ADMINISTRATION AND COMPLIANCE ââ FY 2026-2027 24 Sec. 20. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 25 ACCOUNTABILITY, COMPLIANCE, AND PROGRAM INTEGRITY. There 26 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 27 department of health and human services for the fiscal year 28 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 29 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 30 purposes designated: 31 For accountability, compliance, and program integrity, 32 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 33 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 34 equivalent positions: 35 -22- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 22/ 42 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,152,404 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 409.00 2 1. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $2,602,312 3 is allocated for foster care review and the court appointed 4 special advocate program, including for salaries, support, 5 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes. 6 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $1,148,959 7 is allocated for the office of long-term care ombudsman 8 for salaries, support, administration, maintenance, and 9 miscellaneous purposes. 10 DIVISION X 11 TRANSFERS, CASH FLOW, AND NONREVERSIONS ââ FY 2026-2027 12 Sec. 21. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 13 TRANSFERS AND CASH FLOW. 14 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 15 the department may transfer moneys appropriated under this Act 16 for child protective services to pay the nonfederal share costs 17 of services reimbursed under the medical assistance program, 18 state child care assistance program, or family investment 19 program which are provided to children who would otherwise 20 receive services paid by the appropriation for child protective 21 services. 22 2. The department may transfer moneys from the temporary 23 assistance for needy families block grant to the federal social 24 services block grant appropriation, and to the child care and 25 development block grant appropriation, in accordance with 26 federal law. 27 3. To the extent the department determines that moneys 28 appropriated under this Act, or allocated for a specific 29 purpose under this Act, will remain unencumbered or unobligated 30 at the close of the fiscal year, such unencumbered or 31 unobligated moneys may be used in the same fiscal year for any 32 other purpose for which the appropriated moneys may be used, or 33 for any other allocation within the same appropriation. 34 Sec. 22. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 35 -23- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 23/ 42 H.F. _____ NONREVERSIONS. 1 1. Notwithstanding section 8.33, of the moneys appropriated 2 under this Act from the general fund of the state, the quality 3 assurance trust fund, and the hospital health care access trust 4 fund to the department of health and human services for the 5 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 6 for the purposes of the medical assistance program, the amount 7 in excess of actual expenditures for the medical assistance 8 program that remains unencumbered or unobligated at the close 9 of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 10 for expenditure for the medical assistance program until the 11 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 12 2. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under 13 this Act from the general fund of the state to the department 14 of health and human services for the fiscal year beginning 15 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, and allocated for 16 rural psychiatric residencies, that remain unencumbered or 17 unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 18 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 19 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 20 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under 21 this Act from the general fund of the state to the department 22 of health and human services for the fiscal year beginning July 23 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, and allocated for adoption 24 subsidy payments and related costs, or for post-adoption 25 services and allowable related purposes, that remain 26 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 27 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 28 adoption reinvestment obligations. 29 4. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under 30 this Act from the general fund of the state to the department 31 of health and human services for the fiscal year beginning July 32 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, and allocated for child 33 protective services, that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 34 the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 35 -24- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 24/ 42 H.F. _____ available for expenditure for the partnership between the 1 department of health and human services and the administration 2 of children and family services of the United States department 3 of health and human services to develop and implement the 4 comprehensive welfare information system, also known as VISION. 5 DIVISION XI 6 REPORT ON NONREVERSION OF MONEYS 7 Sec. 23. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ REPORT 8 ON NONREVERSION OF MONEYS. The department of health and 9 human services shall report the expenditure of any moneys for 10 which nonreversion authorization was provided for the fiscal 11 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, to the 12 general assembly on a quarterly basis beginning October 1, 13 2027. 14 DIVISION XII 15 MORE OPTIONS FOR MATERNAL SUPPORT PROGRAM APPROPRIATION 16 NONREVERSION 17 Sec. 24. 2025 Iowa Acts, chapter 169, section 27 , is amended 18 by adding the following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys 20 appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 21 department of health and human services for the fiscal year 22 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, for the more 23 options for maternal support program created in section 217.41C 24 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the 25 fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 26 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the 27 succeeding fiscal year. 28 Sec. 25. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 29 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 30 Sec. 26. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 31 Act applies retroactively to July 1, 2025. 32 DIVISION XIII 33 REIMBURSEMENT RATES ââ REVIEW 34 Sec. 27. Section 235.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 35 -25- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 25/ 42 H.F. _____ following new subsection: 1 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. Upon implementation by the department 2 of a uniform cost report for shelter care and qualified 3 residential treatment providers, biennially conduct a review of 4 shelter care and qualified residential treatment provider costs 5 compared to current shelter care and qualified residential 6 treatment provider rates. On or before October 1 of the 7 calendar year immediately succeeding the calendar year in 8 which the review is conducted, the department shall submit a 9 report to the governor and the general assembly detailing the 10 results of the departmentâs review and recommendations for rate 11 adjustments. 12 Sec. 28. Section 249A.4, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 15. a. Conduct an annual review of 15 provider reimbursement rates for medical and health services 16 provided under this chapter that are reimbursed by a statewide 17 fee schedule and that are not periodically updated or rebased 18 pursuant to federal or state law or rule. The department shall 19 compare each provider reimbursement rate in the following 20 manner: 21 (1) For all medical and health services other than dental 22 services, to reimbursement rates under the federal Medicare 23 program. 24 (2) For dental services, to reimbursement rates for 25 Medicaid programs in states contiguous to Iowa. 26 b. On or before January 15 of each calendar year, the 27 department shall submit to the general assembly a report 28 summarizing the departmentâs review under paragraph âaâ . 29 Sec. 29. NEW SECTION . 249A.32C Home and community-based 30 service waivers ââ provider rate limits. 31 1. For purposes of this section: 32 a. âConsumerâ means the same as defined in section 249A.29. 33 b. âProviderâ means the same as defined in section 249A.29. 34 c. âWaiverâ means the same as defined in section 249A.29. 35 -26- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 26/ 42 H.F. _____ 2. On or before July 1 of each fiscal year, each provider 1 shall submit actual cost of service and supply data to the 2 department. Upon request by the department, a provider shall 3 submit to reasonable review of the actual cost of service and 4 supply data submitted. 5 3. a. Upon the required submission of annual cost reports 6 by providers and implementation by the department of a waiver 7 fee schedule, the department, with input from the public, 8 consumers, providers, and other stakeholders, shall develop a 9 proposed cost-based reimbursement system and related changes to 10 department policies and procedures for all services rendered 11 under a waiver during the period of review specified by 12 the department. The cost-based reimbursement system shall 13 be developed using information provided to the department 14 including but not limited to all of the following: 15 (1) Provider cost data. 16 (2) Provider claims data. 17 (3) Consumer needs assessment data. 18 (4) Other relevant regional and national data. 19 b. The department shall, with input from providers and 20 other relevant stakeholders, develop a uniform and streamlined 21 provider cost reporting mechanism for home and community-based 22 services. 23 4. At least once every four calendar years, the department 24 shall establish a new base period to be used in calculating 25 proposed rate models and related changes to department policies 26 and procedures. On or before October 1 of each year that a 27 new base period is established, the department shall submit 28 a report to the general assembly that includes proposed 29 rate models, the projected fiscal impact of implementing the 30 proposed rate models, including documentation supporting the 31 actuarial soundness of the proposed rate models, and the 32 proposed changes to department policies and procedures. 33 DIVISION XIV 34 MENTAL DISEASES EXCLUSION ââ WAIVER 35 -27- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 27/ 42 H.F. _____ Sec. 30. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ MEDICAL 1 DISEASES EXCLUSION WAIVER. No later than July 1, 2027, the 2 department of health and human services shall apply to the 3 centers for Medicare and Medicaid services of the United 4 States department of health and human services for a waiver of 5 Medicaidâs institution for mental diseases exclusion. 6 DIVISION XV 7 COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTERS REIMBURSEMENT ââ IOWA SAFETY NET 8 MANAGEMENT SYSTEM 9 Sec. 31. IOWA SAFETY NET MANAGEMENT SYSTEM ââ REIMBURSEMENT 10 RATE. By July 1, 2026, the department of health and human 11 services shall increase the reimbursement rate for behavioral 12 health services provided by community health centers under the 13 Iowa safety management system to at least the same rate that 14 substantially similar behavioral health services are reimbursed 15 by Medicaid. 16 DIVISION XVI 17 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT 18 DASHBOARD 19 Sec. 32. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 20 FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT DASHBOARD. The department of health and 21 human services shall create a dashboard on the departmentâs 22 internet site relating to full-time equivalent positions that 23 details all of the following: 24 1. The aggregate amount of moneys appropriated to the 25 department for full-time equivalent positions. 26 2. The maximum number of full-time equivalent positions 27 approved by the general assembly for the department. 28 3. The number of full-time equivalent positions approved 29 by the general assembly for the department categorized by the 30 appropriation, federal grant, or other funding source used to 31 fund each full-time equivalent position. 32 4. The aggregate amount of federal moneys used to fund 33 full-time equivalent positions approved by the general assembly 34 for the department. 35 -28- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 28/ 42 H.F. _____ 5. The aggregate amount of state moneys used to fund 1 full-time equivalent positions approved by the general assembly 2 for the department. 3 6. The number of vacant full-time equivalent positions 4 approved by the general assembly for the department. 5 7. The number of department personnel that are classified as 6 full-time, part-time, or temporary. 7 DIVISION XVII 8 COMPREHENSIVE FAMILY SUPPORT PROGRAM 9 Sec. 33. NEW SECTION . 231.80 Comprehensive family support 10 program. 11 1. For the purposes of this section, unless the context 12 otherwise requires: 13 a. âComprehensive family supportâ means services and 14 supports that assist families caring for an individual with 15 a disability who is a member of the family, including but 16 not limited to programs, services, parent-to-parent support, 17 assistive devices, and various adaptations that allow an 18 individual with a disability to participate more fully in 19 family and community life. 20 b. (1) âFamilyâ means a group of interdependent persons 21 living in the same household. A family consists of an 22 individual with a disability and any of the following: 23 (a) The individualâs parent. 24 (b) The individualâs sibling. 25 (c) The individualâs grandparent, aunt, or uncle. 26 (d) The individualâs legal custodian. 27 (e) A person providing short-term foster care to the 28 individual with a disability subject to a case permanency plan 29 that provides for reunification between the individual and the 30 individualâs parent. 31 (2) âFamilyâ does not include a person who is employed 32 to provide services to an individual with a disability in an 33 out-of-home setting, including but not limited to a hospital, 34 nursing facility, personal care home, board and care home, 35 -29- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 29/ 42 H.F. _____ group foster care home, or other institutional setting. 1 c. âIndividual with a disabilityâ means an individual who is 2 less than twenty-two years of age and meets the definition of 3 developmental disability in 42 U.S.C. Â§15002. 4 d. âServices and supportâ means assistance intended 5 to enable an individual with a disability to control 6 the individualâs environment, to remain living with the 7 individualâs family, to function more independently, and 8 to increase the integration of the individual into the 9 individualâs community including but not limited to funding 10 for purchase of equipment, respite care, supplies, assistive 11 technology, and payment of other costs attributable to 12 the individualâs disability which are identified by the 13 individualâs family. 14 2. A comprehensive family support program is created under 15 the purview of the department to provide a statewide system of 16 services and support to eligible families. The program shall 17 be implemented in a manner that enables a family member of an 18 individual with a disability to identify the needed services 19 and support. 20 3. Eligibility for the program is limited to families who 21 meet all of the following criteria: 22 a. The family resides in the state of Iowa. 23 b. The family intends for the family member who is an 24 individual with a disability to remain living in the familyâs 25 home. 26 c. The familyâs taxable income is less than sixty thousand 27 dollars for the most recently completed tax year. 28 4. A family may apply to the department or to a family 29 support center for assistance under the comprehensive family 30 support program. The department or family support center shall 31 determine eligibility for the comprehensive family support 32 program in accordance with subsection 3. 33 5. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 34 17A to implement the comprehensive family support program. 35 -30- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 30/ 42 H.F. _____ The comprehensive family support program must do all of the 1 following: 2 a. To the extent possible, incorporate in the application 3 process the eligibility determination processes that the 4 department uses for other disability services programs. 5 b. Ensure the ability of families to maintain control of 6 decisions which affect an individual with a disability who is a 7 member of a family. 8 c. Utilize existing local agencies to provide facilities and 9 a single entry point for program applicants. 10 d. Ensure services and support are provided in a timely 11 manner and emergency access to needed services and support is 12 provided. 13 e. Ensure technical assistance is provided to providers and 14 users of services and support. 15 f. Utilize state, regional, and local media to publicize the 16 program. 17 g. Incorporate a process to appeal the departmentâs or 18 family support centerâs denial of services and support to a 19 family under the program, including reasonable efforts by the 20 department to utilize telecommunications in the appeal process. 21 h. Identify the services and support, and service provider 22 components, included in the program. 23 i. Upon request by a family member, provide a family with 24 assistance in locating a service provider. 25 j. Make payment for services and support directly to 26 families by voucher or other appropriate means. 27 k. Utilize a voucher system for payment for the family 28 support center component of the program under subsection 7. 29 6. Services and support provided under the comprehensive 30 family support program shall not be used to supplant other 31 services and support available to a family of an individual 32 with a disability but shall be used to meet family needs that 33 will not be met without the program. 34 7. The comprehensive family support program shall include a 35 -31- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 31/ 42 H.F. _____ family support center component. Under the component, a family 1 member of an individual with a disability shall be assisted 2 by a family support center in identifying the services and 3 support to be provided to the family under the family support 4 subsidy program or the comprehensive family support program. 5 The identification of services and support must be based upon 6 the specific needs of the individual with a disability and 7 the individualâs family which are not met by other service 8 programs available to the individual with a disability and the 9 individualâs family. 10 8. The comprehensive family support program shall be funded 11 by appropriations made by the general assembly for purposes of 12 the program. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated 13 for the comprehensive family support program under this section 14 that remain unobligated or unexpended at the close of each 15 fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 16 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the 17 immediately succeeding fiscal year. 18 Sec. 34. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor is directed 19 to designate section 231.80, as enacted in this division 20 of this Act, as subchapter VIII of chapter 231 entitled 21 âComprehensive Family Support Programâ. 22 Sec. 35. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 23 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 24 Sec. 36. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 25 Act applies retroactively to July 1, 2025. 26 DIVISION XVIII 27 FEDERAL COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT 28 Sec. 37. 2025 Iowa Acts, chapter 152, section 2, subsection 29 1, paragraph d, is amended to read as follows: 30 d. For the federal fiscal year beginning October 1, 2025, 31 and ending September 30, 2026, of Of the moneys allocated 32 to providers under paragraph âcâ, 70 percent of the moneys 33 allocated each federal fiscal year shall be distributed by 34 a behavioral health administrative services organization or 35 -32- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 32/ 42 H.F. _____ the department of health and human services to the stateâs 1 accredited community mental health centers designated by 2 the department of health and human services under section 3 225A.3 , as enacted by 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1161, section 4 3 . Community mental health centers that receive moneys 5 distributed under this paragraph shall use the moneys for the 6 purposes of training staff, providing services to adults with 7 a serious mental illness, or providing services to children 8 with a serious emotional disturbance, and shall bill treatment 9 dollars related to such services to the department of health 10 and human services through the departmentâs claims system. 11 The department of health and human services shall publish the 12 amounts to be distributed to community mental health centers on 13 the departmentâs internet site on or before October 1, 2025, 14 and on or before October 1, 2026, and distribute the moneys to 15 the recipients on a quarterly basis. Recipients of the moneys 16 shall submit quarterly reports to the department of health and 17 human services containing data consistent with performance 18 measures approved by the federal substance abuse and mental 19 health services administration. 20 DIVISION XIX 21 CHILD WELFARE AND JUVENILE JUSTICE DECATEGORIZATION 22 Sec. 38. Section 235.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 2. Membership. The department may authorize the governance 25 boards of decategorization of child welfare and juvenile 26 justice funding projects established under section 232.188 to 27 appoint the transition committee membership and may utilize 28 the boundaries of decategorization projects to establish 29 the service areas for transition committees. The committee 30 A committeeâs membership may include but is not limited to 31 department staff involved with foster care, child welfare, 32 and adult services, juvenile court services staff, staff 33 involved with county general assistance or emergency relief 34 under chapter 251 or 252 , school district and area education 35 -33- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 33/ 42 H.F. _____ agency staff involved with special education, and a childâs 1 court appointed special advocate, guardian ad litem, service 2 providers, and other persons knowledgeable about the child. 3 Sec. 39. Section 237A.1, subsection 2, paragraph j, 4 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended by striking the 5 subparagraph. 6 Sec. 40. Section 249A.26, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 7 amended by striking the subsection. 8 Sec. 41. Section 256I.4, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 9 by striking the subsection. 10 Sec. 42. REPEAL. Section 232.188, Code 2026, is repealed. 11 Sec. 43. DECATEGORIZATION CARRYOVER FUNDING. 12 1. For purposes of this section, unless the context 13 otherwise requires: 14 a. âCarryover fundingâ means unobligated or unencumbered 15 moneys described in section 232.188, subsection 5, paragraph 16 âbâ, Code 2026, at the close of the fiscal year beginning July 17 1, 2025. 18 b. âDecategorization projectâ means the same as defined in 19 section 232.188, Code 2026. 20 c. âFunding poolâ means the same as defined in section 21 232.188, Code 2026. 22 d. âGovernance boardâ means the same as defined in section 23 232.188, Code 2026. 24 2. Carryover funding that remains in a funding pool at the 25 close of the fiscal year beginning Ju1y 1, 2025, which has been 26 encumbered or obligated by the governance board for a multiyear 27 service decategorization project for that fiscal year, shall 28 remain available for expenditure to ensure continuation of 29 such service or activity until the close of the fiscal year 30 beginning July 1, 2028, or until the close of the fiscal year 31 in which the service or activity is completed, whichever is 32 earlier. 33 3. Carryover funding that remains in a funding pool at the 34 end of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, which remains 35 -34- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 34/ 42 H.F. _____ unencumbered or unobligated by the governance board for a 1 multiyear service decategorization project for that fiscal 2 year, shall be appropriated to the department of health and 3 human services and juvenile court services proportionately 4 based on the percentage of moneys appropriated to each entity 5 by the general assembly for decategorization projects. 6 Sec. 44. EFFECTIVE DATE. The section of this division of 7 this Act related to decategorization carryover funding, being 8 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 9 Sec. 45. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. The section of this 10 division of this Act related to decategorization carryover 11 funding applies retroactively to July 1, 2025. 12 DIVISION XX 13 COMMITMENT OR HOSPITALIZATION OF CERTAIN PERSONS WITH SUBSTANCE 14 USE DISORDERS OR MENTAL ILLNESS 15 Sec. 46. Section 125.81, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 1. a. If a person filing an application requests that a 18 respondent be taken into immediate custody, and the court upon 19 reviewing the application and accompanying documentation, finds 20 probable cause to believe that the respondent is a person with 21 a substance use disorder who is likely to injure the person or 22 other persons if allowed to remain at liberty, the court may 23 enter a written order directing that the respondent be taken 24 into immediate custody by the sheriff, and be detained until 25 the commitment hearing, which shall be held no more than five 26 days after the date of the order, except that if the fifth 27 day after the date of the order is a Saturday, Sunday, or a 28 holiday, the hearing may be held on the next business day. The 29 court may order the respondent detained for the period of time 30 until the hearing is held, and no longer except as provided in 31 section 125.88 , in accordance with subsection 2 , paragraph âaâ , 32 if possible, and if not, then in accordance with subsection 2 , 33 paragraph âbâ , or, only if neither of these alternatives is 34 available in accordance with subsection 2 , paragraph âcâ . 35 -35- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 35/ 42 H.F. _____ b. The county in which a respondent is taken into immediate 1 custody by the sheriff pursuant to paragraph âaâ shall 2 compensate the sheriff, as determined by the county board of 3 supervisors of that county and consistent with section 331.655, 4 subsection 1, paragraph âlâ , for conveyance of the respondent 5 to a detention location. 6 Sec. 47. Section 229.2, subsection 1, paragraph b, 7 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 (3) As soon as is practicable after the filing of a 9 petition for juvenile court approval of the admission of the 10 minor, the juvenile court shall determine whether the minor 11 has an attorney to represent the minor in the hospitalization 12 proceeding, and if not, the court shall assign to appoint the 13 minor an attorney pursuant to section 815.10 . If the minor is 14 financially unable to pay for an attorney, the attorney shall 15 be compensated by an administrative services organization at an 16 hourly rate to be established by the administrative services 17 organization in substantially the same manner as provided in 18 section 815.7 . 19 Sec. 48. Section 229.8, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 20 to read as follows: 21 1. Determine whether the respondent has an attorney 22 who is able and willing to represent the respondent in the 23 hospitalization proceeding, and if not, whether the respondent 24 is financially able to employ an attorney and capable of 25 meaningfully assisting in selecting one. In accordance with 26 those determinations, the court shall if necessary allow 27 the respondent to select, or pursuant to section 815.10 28 shall assign to appoint the respondent, an attorney. If the 29 respondent is financially unable to pay an attorney, the 30 attorney shall be compensated by an administrative services 31 organization at an hourly rate to be established by the 32 administrative services organization in substantially the same 33 manner as provided in section 815.7 . 34 Sec. 49. Section 229.10, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 35 -36- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 36/ 42 H.F. _____ 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1 a. An examination of the respondent shall be conducted by 2 one or more licensed physicians or mental health professionals, 3 as required by the courtâs order, within a reasonable time. 4 If the respondent is detained pursuant to section 229.11, 5 subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ âaâ , subparagraph (2) , the 6 examination shall be conducted within twenty-four hours. 7 If the respondent is detained pursuant to section 229.11, 8 subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ or âcâ , subparagraph (1) or (3) , the 9 examination shall be conducted within forty-eight hours. If 10 the respondent so desires, the respondent shall be entitled to 11 a separate examination by a licensed physician or mental health 12 professional of the respondentâs own choice. The reasonable 13 cost of the examinations shall, if the respondent lacks 14 sufficient funds to pay the cost, be paid by an administrative 15 services organization upon order of the court. 16 Sec. 50. Section 229.11, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2026, are 17 amended to read as follows: 18 1. a. If the applicant requests that the respondent be 19 taken into immediate custody and the judge, upon reviewing the 20 application and accompanying documentation, finds probable 21 cause to believe that the respondent has a serious mental 22 impairment and is likely to injure the respondent or other 23 persons if allowed to remain at liberty, the judge may enter 24 a written order directing that the respondent be taken into 25 immediate custody by the sheriff or the sheriffâs deputy 26 and be detained until the hospitalization hearing. The 27 hospitalization hearing shall be held no more than five days 28 after the date of the order, except that if the fifth day after 29 the date of the order is a Saturday, Sunday, or a holiday, the 30 hearing may be held on the next succeeding business day. If 31 the expenses of a respondent are payable in whole or in part 32 by an administrative services organization, for a placement 33 in accordance with paragraph âaâ , the judge shall give notice 34 of the placement to an administrative services organization, 35 -37- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 37/ 42 H.F. _____ and for a placement in accordance with paragraph âbâ or âcâ , 1 the judge shall order the placement in a hospital or facility 2 designated by an administrative services organization. The 3 judge may order the respondent detained for the period of time 4 until the hearing is held, and no longer, in accordance with 5 paragraph âaâ subparagraph (1) , if possible, and if not then 6 in accordance with paragraph âbâ subparagraph (2) , or, only if 7 neither of these alternatives is available, in accordance with 8 paragraph âcâ subparagraph (3) . Detention may be in any of the 9 following: 10 a. (1) In the custody of a relative, friend, or other 11 suitable person who is willing to accept responsibility for 12 supervision of the respondent, and the respondent may be placed 13 under such reasonable restrictions as the judge may order 14 including but not limited to restrictions on or a prohibition 15 of any expenditure, encumbrance, or disposition of the 16 respondentâs funds or property. 17 b. (2) In a suitable hospital the chief medical officer of 18 which shall be informed of the reasons why immediate custody 19 has been ordered and may provide treatment which is necessary 20 to preserve the respondentâs life, or to appropriately control 21 behavior by the respondent which is likely to result in 22 physical injury to the respondent or to others if allowed 23 to continue, but may not otherwise provide treatment to the 24 respondent without the respondentâs consent. 25 c. (3) In the nearest facility in the community which is 26 licensed to care for persons with mental illness or substance 27 use disorder, provided that detention in a jail or other 28 facility intended for confinement of those accused or convicted 29 of crime shall not be ordered. 30 b. The county in which a respondent is taken into immediate 31 custody by the sheriff pursuant to paragraph âaâ shall 32 compensate the sheriff, as determined by the county board of 33 supervisors of that county and consistent with section 331.655, 34 subsection 1, paragraph âlâ , for conveyance of the respondent 35 -38- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 38/ 42 H.F. _____ to a detention location. 1 3. If a respondent is detained pursuant to subsection 1 , 2 paragraph âbâ or âcâ âaâ , subparagraph (2) or (3) , the sheriff 3 or the sheriffâs deputy that took the respondent into immediate 4 custody may inform the hospital or facility that an arrest 5 warrant has been issued for or charges are pending against the 6 respondent and may request the hospital or facility to notify 7 the sheriff or the sheriffâs deputy about the discharge of the 8 respondent prior to discharge. 9 Sec. 51. Section 229.22, subsection 2, paragraph a, 10 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 (1) In the circumstances described in subsection 1 , any 12 peace officer who has reasonable grounds to believe that 13 a person is mentally ill, and because of that illness is 14 likely to physically injure the personâs self or others if 15 not immediately detained, may without a warrant take or cause 16 that person to be taken to the nearest available facility or 17 hospital as defined described in section 229.11, subsection 1 , 18 paragraphs âbâ paragraph âaâ , subparagraphs (2) and âcâ (3) . A 19 person believed mentally ill, and likely to injure the personâs 20 self or others if not immediately detained, may be delivered to 21 a facility or hospital by someone other than a peace officer. 22 Sec. 52. Section 815.9, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 23 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 For purposes of this chapter , chapters 13B , 125, 229, 229A , 25 232 , 665 , 812 , 814 , and 822 , and section 811.1A , and the rules 26 of criminal procedure, a person is indigent if the person is 27 entitled to an attorney appointed by the court as follows: 28 DIVISION XXI 29 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ BEHAVIORAL HEALTH 30 EXPENDITURE REPORT 31 Sec. 53. NEW SECTION . 225A.10 Behavioral health services 32 expenditure report. 33 No later than December 15 of each year, the department shall 34 submit to the general assembly a summary of the departmentâs 35 -39- LSB 5004YC (17) 91 ak/ko 39/ 42 H.F. _____ expenditures for behavioral health services for adults and 1 children for the immediately preceding fiscal year, including a 2 summary of which appropriations or funding sources were used to 3 fund the expenditures. 4 DIVISION XXII 5 OPIOID SETTLEMENT FUND ââ FY 2026-2027 6 Sec. 54. OPIOID SETTLEMENT FUND ââ DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND 7 HUMAN SERVICES. 8 1. There is appropriated from the opioid settlement fund 9 created in section 12.51 to the department of health and human 10 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 11 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof is as 12 necessary, for the purposes designated: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,000,000 14 2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 15 of the moneys appropriated to the department of health and 16 human services under subsection 1, the department shall 17 disburse to an opioid treatment program that operates a 18 facility with at least one hundred fifty licensed beds that 19 provides medical detoxification stabilization and residential 20 substance abuse disorder treatment to support comprehensive 21 addiction and co-occuring mental health treatment, and provides 22 24-hour medical detoxification, residential treatment, and 23 medication-assisted treatment. 24